District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.06

Administration of medication in emergency circumstances.

(a)

No employee or agent of a school shall administer medication in emergency circumstances to any student unless he or she has been trained and certified pursuant to § 38-651.04.

(b)

The Mayor shall obtain a standing order signed by at least one practicing physician licensed in the District that identifies the specific medications that may be administered in emergency circumstances and provides appropriate administration instructions.

(c)

A student need not have a known diagnosis or a medication action plan to receive treatment in emergency circumstances from a trained employee or agent of the school.

(d)

The Mayor shall develop a procedure by which the responsible person may request that a minor student not receive treatment in emergency circumstances.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 7, 54 DCR 12230

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2008-85, June 11, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9362).